Nebraska, session 109, LB451.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB451 LB451
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 69-1317, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
69-1317 (a)(1)(i) (a)(1) Except as otherwise provided in this
subdivision, all funds received under the Uniform Disposition of
Unclaimed Property Act, including the proceeds from the sale of abandoned
property under section 69-1316, shall be deposited by the State Treasurer
into the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund from which he or she shall make
prompt payment of claims allowed pursuant to the act and payment of any
expenses related to unclaimed property. All funds received under section
69-1307.05 shall be deposited by the State Treasurer into the Unclaimed
Property Trust Fund from which he or she shall make prompt payment of
claims regarding such funds allowed pursuant to the act. Transfers from
the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the General Fund may be made at the
direction of the Legislature. Before making the deposit he or she shall
record the name and last-known address of each person appearing from the
holders' reports to be entitled to the abandoned property, the name and
last-known address of each insured person or annuitant, and with respect
to each policy or contract listed in the report of a life insurance
corporation, its number, the name of the corporation, and the amount due.
The record shall be available for public inspection during business
hours. The separate life insurance corporation demutualization trust fund
terminates on March 13, 2019, and the State Treasurer shall transfer any
money in the fund on such date to the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund.
(ii) The record shall not be subject to public inspection or
available for copying, reproduction, or scrutiny by commercial or
professional locators of property presumed abandoned who charge any
service or finders' fee until twenty-four months after the names from the
holders' reports have been published or officially disclosed. Records
concerning the social security number, date of birth, and last-known
address of an owner shall be treated as confidential and subject to the
same confidentiality as tax return information held by the Department of
-2-

LB451 LB451
2025 2025
Revenue, except that the Auditor of Public Accounts shall have
unrestricted access to such records.
(iii) A professional finders' fee shall be limited to ten percent of
the total dollar amount of the property presumed abandoned. To claim any
such fee, the finder shall disclose to the owner the nature, location,
and value of the property, provide notice of when such property was
reported to the State Treasurer, and provide notice that the property may
be claimed by the owner from the State Treasurer free of charge. To claim
any such fee if the property has not yet been abandoned, the finder shall
disclose to the owner the nature, location, and value of the property,
provide notice of when such property will be reported to the State
Treasurer, if known, and provide notice that, upon receipt of the
property by the State Treasurer, such property may be claimed by the
owner from the State Treasurer free of charge.
(2)(i) (2) The unclaimed property records of the State Treasurer,
the unclaimed property reports of holders, and the information derived by
an unclaimed property examination or audit of the records of a person or
otherwise obtained by or communicated to the State Treasurer may be
withheld from the public. Any record or information that may be withheld
under the laws of this state or of the United States when in the
possession of such a person may be withheld when revealed or delivered to
the State Treasurer. Any record or information that is withheld under any
law of another state when in the possession of that other state may be
withheld when revealed or delivered by the other state to the State
Treasurer.
(ii) Information withheld from the general public concerning any
aspect of unclaimed property shall only be disclosed to an apparent owner
of the property or to the escheat, unclaimed, or abandoned property
administrators or officials of another state if that other state accords
substantially reciprocal privileges to the State Treasurer.
(b)(1) (b) On or before November 1 of each year prior to 2025, the
-3-

LB451 LB451
2025 2025
State Treasurer shall transfer distribute any balance in excess of one
million dollars from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the permanent
school fund.
(2) On or before November 1 of each year beginning in 2025 through
2034, the State Treasurer shall transfer any balance in excess of one
million dollars from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund as follows:
(i) The first one million dollars to the Capitol Restoration Cash
Fund; and
(ii) Any remaining balance to the permanent school fund.
(3) On or before November 1 of each year beginning in 2035, the
State Treasurer shall transfer any balance in excess of one million
dollars from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund to the permanent school
fund.
(c) Before making any deposit to the credit of the permanent school
fund, the Capitol Restoration Cash Fund, or the General Fund, the State
Treasurer may deduct any costs related to unclaimed property and place
such funds in the Unclaimed Property Cash Fund.
(d) The Unclaimed Property Cash Fund which is hereby created.
Transfers from the fund to the General Fund may be made at the direction
of the Legislature. Any money in the Unclaimed Property Cash Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 2. Section 72-2211, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
72-2211 (1) The Capitol Restoration Cash Fund is created. The
administrator shall administer the fund, which shall consist of money
received from the sale of material, rental revenue, private donations,
public donations, and transfers as directed by the Legislature from the
Capitol Preservation, Restoration, and Enhancement Endowment Fund, the
Unclaimed Property Trust Fund, and transfers from the Nebraska Capital
-4-

LB451 LB451
2025 2025
Construction Fund as directed by the Legislature.
(2)(a) The Capitol Restoration Cash Fund shall be used to finance
projects for the restoration, preservation, and enhancement of the State
Capitol and its courtyards and grounds, to purchase and conserve items to
be added to the Nebraska Capitol Collections housed in the State Capitol,
to produce promotional material concerning the State Capitol, its
grounds, and the Nebraska State Capitol Environs District, and to pay the
expenditures for a project manager for the Capitol Heating, Ventilation,
and Air Conditioning Systems Replacement Project until such time as the
project is completed, except that transfers may be made from the fund to
the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Such expenditures
shall be prescribed by the administrator and approved by the commission.
(b) Money transferred to the fund from the Capitol Preservation,
Restoration, and Enhancement Endowment Fund shall only be used for the
restoration, preservation, and enhancement of the courtyards located at
the State Capitol.
(3) Any money in the Capitol Restoration Cash Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.
Sec. 3. Original sections 69-1317 and 72-2211, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-